Massachusetts, session 194th, H3039.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Section 1. Section 38BB of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as amended by section 19 of 
chapter 50 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking out subdivision (5) and inserting in 
place thereof the following subdivision:-   
(5)  EOHLC may authorize up to $100,000,000 in credits annually under this section and 
subsection (q) of section 6 of chapter 62. EOHLC may authorize annually any credits under this 
section or said subsection (q) of said section 6 of said chapter 62 returned to EOHLC by a 
certified housing development project. The total amount of credits authorized during a year shall 
include: (1) credits granted during the year under this section or said subsection (q) of section 6 
of chapter 62; and (2) carry forwards of credits from prior years under this section or said 
subsection (q) of section 6 of chapter 62, to the extent that such credit carry forwards are 
estimated by the commissioner of revenue to offset tax liabilities during the year. Any portion of 
the $100,000,000 annual cap not awarded by EOHLC in a calendar year may be applied to 

of 2 13 awards in a subsequent year. EOHLC shall provide the commissioner of revenue with any 
documentation that the commissioner deems necessary to confirm compliance with the annual 
cap and the commissioner shall provide a report confirming compliance with the annual cap to 
the secretary of administration and finance and the secretary of housing and livable communities.   
Section 2. Section 6(q) of chapter 62, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding the 
following subsection:-   
(7) EOHLC may authorize up to $5,000,000 in credits to an individual project.    
Section 3. Section 1 of chapter 40V of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by striking the definition “housing development project” and inserting in place thereof 
the following:   
"Housing development project'', a multi-unit residential rehabilitation project that is 
located in a gateway municipality and once rehabilitated, shall contain at least 75 per cent market 
rate units.   
Section 4. Chapter 40V Section 4 (a)(iv) is hereby amended by striking “80 per cent” and 
inserting in place thereof  “75 per cent”.   
Section 5. Title VII Chapter 40V Section 3 Approval of application for tax exemption for 
housing development project under Sec. 59 of chapter 59 shall be amended as follows:   
Under section 5M of chapter 59, the department shall approve within 90 days a 
municipality's tax exemption agreement for a housing development project located within an 
approved housing development zone.